Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-512.01
County attorney or authorized attorney; duty to take action against nonsupporting parent or stepparent; when.

It shall be the duty of the county attorney or authorized attorney when a copy of the finding of investigation or the application for financial assistance has been filed with him or her as provided in section 43-512, or when an application has been made pursuant to section 43-512.02, to immediately take action against the nonsupporting parent or stepparent of the dependent child. It shall be the duty of the county attorney or authorized attorney to initiate a child support enforcement action. If the county attorney initiates an action, he or she shall file either a criminal complaint for nonsupport under section 28-706 or a civil complaint against the nonsupporting parent or stepparent under section 43-512.03. If the attorney who initiates a child support enforcement action is an authorized attorney, he or she shall file a civil complaint against the nonsupporting parent or stepparent pursuant to section 43-512.03.

Laws 1947, c. 158, § 2, p. 437;

Laws 1951, c. 79, § 6, p. 241;

Laws 1969, c. 343, § 4, p. 1207;

Laws 1976, LB 926, § 4;

Laws 1977, LB 425, § 2;

Laws 1978, LB 748, § 28;

Laws 1981, LB 345, § 1;

Laws 1983, LB 371, § 13;

Laws 1984, LB 845, § 33;

Laws 1985, Second Spec. Sess., LB 7, § 66;

Laws 2004, LB 1207, § 36.

In civil child support action by county attorney, father's counterclaim requesting custody did not create conflict of interest for county attorney and the trial court erred in appointing a special prosecutor to replace the county attorney. State on behalf of Garcia v. Garcia, 238 Neb. 455, 471 N.W.2d 388 (1991).